Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-2507.01
Instrument-assisted modality, defined.

Instrument-assisted modality means the therapeutic use of an instrument or tool that is manually applied by a trained practitioner to target specific tissues including skin, fascia, and other connective tissues or muscle.

Laws 2025, LB257, § 21.